Illinois, session 104th, SB2808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Electric Transmission Facilities Siting Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. 7    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.8    "Department" means the Illinois Department of 9Transportation.10    "Developer" means an individual, partnership, corporation, 11or other entity seeking to build or maintain a high-voltage 12electric service line.13    "Electric transmission facilities" means electric 14transmission lines, transmission towers, conductors, 15insulators, foundations, grounding systems, access roads, and 16any associated electric facilities, including transmission 17substations.18    "Highway" has the meaning given to that term in Section 192-202 of the Illinois Highway Code.20    "High-voltage electric service line" means an electric 21transmission line having a design voltage of 100,000 volts or 22more.23    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Transportation.  SB2808- 2 -LRB104 16795 AAS 30204 b1    "Public utility" has the meaning given to that term in 2Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act. 3    Section 10. Siting of electric transmission facilities.4    (a) In the siting of new electric transmission facilities, 5including high-voltage electric service lines, available 6corridors shall be used in the following order of priority:7        (1) Existing public utility corridors.8        (2) Highway corridors.9        (3) New corridors.10    (b) Permitting on the corridors listed in subsection (a) 11shall be done, to the greatest extent possible, in a manner 12that accounts for economic and engineering considerations, the 13reliability of the electric system, and the protection of the 14environment.  15    Section 15. High-voltage electric service line colocation 16requests.17    (a) A public utility or developer may construct, place, or 18maintain a high-voltage electric service line on a public 19right-of-way or along a highway if (i) the public utility or 20developer submits to the Secretary a colocation request for 21the high-voltage electric service line and (ii) the Secretary 22reviews and approves the colocation request.23    (b) The Secretary may deny a colocation request under this 24Section if the Secretary determines that the construction,   SB2808- 3 -LRB104 16795 AAS 30204 b1placement, or maintenance of a high-voltage electric service 2line on a public right-of-way or along a highway would 3endanger public safety or would interfere with the proper 4function of the highway.5    (c) If the Secretary denies a colocation request under 6this Section, the Secretary shall submit the reasons for the 7denial to the applicable public utility or developer and the 8Commission within 90 days after the issuance of the denial. 9    Section 20. High-voltage electric service line evaluation; 10constructability report.11    (a) A public utility or developer may submit a written 12request to the Department for an evaluation of the corridors 13described in subsection (a) of Section 10 for possible 14locations for a high-voltage electric service line. Within 30 15days after receipt of a written request under this subsection 16(a), the Secretary shall assign a project coordinator to the 17request. A project coordinator, upon assignment to a request, 18shall begin the evaluation in coordination with the applicable 19public utility or developer.20    (b) The Department shall inform a public utility or 21developer about any of the Department's current plans or 22projects that could impact the public utility's or developer's 23potential construction or placement of a high-voltage electric 24service line within a corridor.25    (c) After an evaluation under subsection (a) identifies an   SB2808- 4 -LRB104 16795 AAS 30204 b1acceptable location within a corridor, a public utility or 2developer, in consultation with the Department, shall develop 3a constructability report. The constructability report shall 4include (i) the terms and conditions for the siting of the 5high-voltage electric service line and (ii) an agreed-upon 6time frame during which the Department may not request the 7relocation of the high-voltage electric service line. The 8Department shall issue a permit to the public utility or 9developer for the use of a public right-of-way within the 10corridor for the siting of a high-voltage electric service 11line only after a constructability report is approved by both 12the Department and the public utility or developer.13    (d) A public utility or developer and the Department shall 14follow the terms and conditions of the approved 15constructability report during the planning and approval 16process for the siting of a high-voltage electric service 17line. If the Department requires the relocation of a 18high-voltage electric service line on a public right-of-way by 19a specific date, the Department shall give the applicable 20public utility or developer notice of the required relocation 21no less than 10 years before the date of the required 22relocation.23    (e) If the Department requires the relocation of a 24high-voltage electric service line during the prohibited time 25frame specified in the constructability report or the 26Department provides notice of the required relocation of a   SB2808- 5 -LRB104 16795 AAS 30204 b1high-voltage electric service line to a public utility or 2developer less than 10 years before the date of the required 3relocation, the Department shall be responsible for 75% of the 4costs incurred by the public utility or developer in the 5relocation of the high-voltage electric service line. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.